Hawaii statutes.
[§87A-7] Chair, vice-chair, and
secretary-treasurer. The trustees shall elect from among the members a
chair, a vice-chair, and a secretary-treasurer. [L 2001, c 88, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next